Utah statutes.
48-2e-212.   Annual report for division.

(1)  A limited partnership or a registered foreign limited partnership shall deliver to the division for filing an annual report that states:

(a)  the name of the limited partnership or foreign limited partnership;

(b)  the information required by Subsection 16-17-203(1);

(c)  the street and mailing addresses of its principal office;

(d)  the name of at least one general partner; and

(e)  in the case of a foreign limited partnership, the jurisdiction whose law governs the foreign limited partnership's internal affairs and any alternate name adopted under Subsection 48-2e-906(1).

(2)  Information in the annual report must be current as of the date the report is signed by the limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership.

(3)  A report must be delivered to the division for each year following the calendar year in which the limited partnership's certificate of limited partnership became effective or the registered foreign limited partnership registered to do business in this state:

(a)  in the case of a limited partnership, the annual report must be delivered to the division during the month in which is the anniversary date on which the limited partnership certificate of limited partnership became effective; and

(b)  in the case of a registered foreign limited partnership, the annual report must be delivered to the division during the month in which is the anniversary date on which the registered foreign limited partnership registered to do business in this state.

(4)  If an annual report does not contain the information required by this section, the division promptly shall notify the reporting limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership in a record and return the report for correction.

(5)  If an annual report contains the name or address of a registered agent which differs from the information shown in the records of the division immediately before the annual report becomes effective, the differing information in the annual report is considered a statement of change under Section 16-17-206.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

